SpellChecker/bash.aff
FLAG long
SFX X57 0 салыр .	+Der/са+Indf
SFX X57 0 тайсы .	+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX X57 0 сасы .	+Der/са+Clt/сы

SFX X58 Y 195 # N13 Der/лы+
SFX X58 0 тар .	+Pl
SFX X58 0 тармы .	+Pl+Q
SFX X58 0 тармылыр .	+Pl+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 тарҙыр .	+Pl+Indf
SFX X58 0 тарсы .	+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 тың .	+Gen
SFX X58 0 ҡа .	+Dat
SFX X58 0 ты .	+Acc
SFX X58 0 тан .	+Abl
SFX X58 0 та .	+Loc
SFX X58 0 тыңмы.	+Gen+Q
SFX X58 0 ҡамы .	+Dat+Q
SFX X58 0 тымы .	+Acc+Q
SFX X58 0 танмы .	+Abl+Q
SFX X58 0 тамы .	+Loc+Q
SFX X58 0 тыңдыр.	+Gen+Indf
SFX X58 0 ҡалыр .	+Dat+Indf
SFX X58 0 тылыр .	+Acc+Indf
SFX X58 0 тандыр .	+Abl+Indf
SFX X58 0 талыр .	+Loc+Indf
SFX X58 0 тыңсы .	+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ҡасы .	+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 тысы .	+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 тансы .	+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 тасы .	+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 мын .	+Pred1Sg
SFX X58 0 һың .	+Pred2Sg
SFX X58 0 быҙ .	+Pred1Pl
SFX X58 0 һығыҙ .	+Pred2Pl
SFX X58 0 мынмы .	+Pred1Sg+Q
SFX X58 0 һыңмы .	+Pred2Sg+Q
SFX X58 0 быҙмы .	+Pred1Pl+Q
SFX X58 0 һығыҙмы .	+Pred2Pl+Q
SFX X58 0 мындыр .	+Pred1Sg+Indf
SFX X58 0 һыңдыр .	+Pred2Sg+Indf
SFX X58 0 быҙҙыр .	+Pred1Pl+Indf
SFX X58 0 һығыҙҙыр .	+Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX X58 0 мынсы .	+Pred1Sg+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 һыңсы .	+Pred2Sg+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 быҙсы .	+Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 һығыҙсы .	+Pred2Pl+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ым .	+PxSg1
SFX X58 0 ың .	+PxSg2
SFX X58 0 ы .	+PxSg3
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙ .	+PxPl1
SFX X58 0 ығыҙ .	+PxPl2
SFX X58 0 ымдың .	+PxSg1+Gen
SFX X58 0 ыңдың .	+PxSg2+Gen
SFX X58 0 ының .	+PxSg3+Gen
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙың .	+PxPl1+Gen
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙың .	+PxPl2+Gen
SFX X58 0 ыма .	+PxSg1+Dat
SFX X58 0 ыңа .	+PxSg2+Dat
SFX X58 0 ына .	+PxSg3+Dat
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙға .	+PxPl1+Dat
SFX X58 0 ығыҙға .	+PxPl2+Dat
SFX X58 0 ымды .	+PxSg1+Acc
SFX X58 0 ыңды .	+PxSg2+Acc
SFX X58 0 ын .	+PxSg3+Acc
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙы .	+PxPl1+Acc
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙы .	+PxPl2+Acc
SFX X58 0 ымдан .	+PxSg1+Abl
SFX X58 0 ыңдан .	+PxSg2+Abl
SFX X58 0 ынан .	+PxSg3+Abl
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙан .	+PxPl1+Abl
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙан .	+PxPl2+Abl
SFX X58 0 ымда .	+PxSg1+Loc
SFX X58 0 ыңда .	+PxSg2+Loc
SFX X58 0 ында .	+PxSg3+Loc
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙа .	+PxPl1+Loc
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙа .	+PxPl2+Loc
SFX X58 0 ымдыңмы .	+PxSg1+Gen+Q
SFX X58 0 ыңдыңмы .	+PxSg2+Gen+Q
SFX X58 0 ыныңмы .	+PxSg3+Gen+Q
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙыңмы .	+PxPl1+Gen+Q
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙыңмы .	+PxPl2+Gen+Q
SFX X58 0 ымамы .	+PxSg1+Dat+Q
SFX X58 0 ыңамы .	+PxSg2+Dat+Q
SFX X58 0 ынамы .	+PxSg3+Dat+Q
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙғамы .	+PxPl1+Dat+Q
SFX X58 0 ығыҙғамы .	+PxPl2+Dat+Q
SFX X58 0 ымдымы .	+PxSg1+Acc+Q
SFX X58 0 ыңдымы .	+PxSg2+Acc+Q
SFX X58 0 ынмы .	+PxSg3+Acc+Q
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙымы .	+PxPl1+Acc+Q
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙымы .	+PxPl2+Acc+Q
SFX X58 0 ымданмы .	+PxSg1+Abl+Q
SFX X58 0 ыңданмы .	+PxSg2+Abl+Q
SFX X58 0 ынанмы .	+PxSg3+Abl+Q
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙанмы .	+PxPl1+Abl+Q
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙанмы .	+PxPl2+Abl+Q
SFX X58 0 ымдамы .	+PxSg1+Loc+Q
SFX X58 0 ыңдамы .	+PxSg2+Loc+Q
SFX X58 0 ындамы .	+PxSg3+Loc+Q
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙамы .	+PxPl1+Loc+Q
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙамы .	+PxPl2+Loc+Q
SFX X58 0 ымдыңмылыр .	+PxSg1+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыңдыңмылыр .	+PxSg2+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыныңмылыр .	+PxSg3+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙыңмылыр .	+PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙыңмылыр .	+PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ымамылыр .	+PxSg1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыңамылыр .	+PxSg2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ынамылыр .	+PxSg3+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙғамылыр .	+PxPl1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ығыҙғамылыр .	+PxPl2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ымдымылыр .	+PxSg1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыңдымылыр .	+PxSg2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ынмылыр .	+PxSg3+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙымылыр .	+PxPl1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙымылыр .	+PxPl2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ымданмылыр .	+PxSg1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыңданмылыр .	+PxSg2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ынанмылыр .	+PxSg3+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙанмылыр .	+PxPl1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙанмылыр .	+PxPl2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ымдамылыр .	+PxSg1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыңдамылыр .	+PxSg2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ындамылыр .	+PxSg3+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙамылыр .	+PxPl1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙамылыр .	+PxPl2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ымдыңдыр .	+PxSg1+Gen+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыңдыңдыр .	+PxSg2+Gen+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыныңдыр .	+PxSg3+Gen+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙыңдыр .	+PxPl1+Gen+Indf
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙыңдыр .	+PxPl2+Gen+Indf
SFX X58 0 ымалыр .	+PxSg1+Dat+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыңалыр .	+PxSg2+Dat+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыналыр .	+PxSg3+Dat+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙғалыр .	+PxPl1+Dat+Indf
SFX X58 0 ығыҙғалыр .	+PxPl2+Dat+Indf
SFX X58 0 ымдылыр .	+PxSg1+Acc+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыңдылыр .	+PxSg2+Acc+Indf
SFX X58 0 ындыр .	+PxSg3+Acc+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙылыр .	+PxPl1+Acc+Indf
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙылыр .	+PxPl2+Acc+Indf
SFX X58 0 ымдандыр .	+PxSg1+Abl+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыңдандыр .	+PxSg2+Abl+Indf
SFX X58 0 ынандыр .	+PxSg3+Abl+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙандыр .	+PxPl1+Abl+Indf
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙандыр .	+PxPl2+Abl+Indf
SFX X58 0 ымдалыр .	+PxSg1+Loc+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыңдалыр .	+PxSg2+Loc+Indf
SFX X58 0 ындалыр .	+PxSg3+Loc+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙалыр .	+PxPl1+Loc+Indf
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙалыр .	+PxPl2+Loc+Indf
SFX X58 0 ымдыңсы .	+PxSg1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ыңдыңсы .	+PxSg2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ыныңсы .	+PxSg3+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙыңсы .	+PxPl1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙыңсы .	+PxPl2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ымасы .	+PxSg1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ыңасы .	+PxSg2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ынасы .	+PxSg3+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙғасы .	+PxPl1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ығыҙғасы .	+PxPl2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ымдысы .	+PxSg1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ыңдысы .	+PxSg2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ынсы .	+PxSg3+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙысы .	+PxPl1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙысы .	+PxPl2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ымдансы .	+PxSg1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ыңдансы .	+PxSg2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ынансы .	+PxSg3+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙансы .	+PxPl1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙансы .	+PxPl2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ымдасы .	+PxSg1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ыңдасы .	+PxSg2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ындасы .	+PxSg3+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙасы .	+PxPl1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙасы .	+PxPl2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ыммы .	+PxSg1+Q
SFX X58 0 ыңмы .	+PxSg2+Q
SFX X58 0 ымы .	+PxSg3+Q
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙмы .	+PxPl1+Q
SFX X58 0 ығыҙмы .	+PxPl2+Q
SFX X58 0 ыммылыр .	+PxSg1+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыңмылыр .	+PxSg2+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ымылыр .	+PxSg3+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙмылыр .	+PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ығыҙмылыр .	+PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 ымдыр .	+PxSg1+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыңдыр .	+PxSg2+Indf
SFX X58 0 ылыр .	+PxSg3+Indf
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙҙыр .	+PxPl1+Indf
SFX X58 0 ығыҙҙыр .	+PxPl2+Indf
SFX X58 0 ымсы .	+PxSg1+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ыңсы .	+PxSg2+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ысы .	+PxSg3+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ыбыҙсы .	+PxPl1+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 ығыҙсы .	+PxPl2+Clt/сы
SFX X58 0 мы .	+Q
SFX X58 0 мылыр .	+Q+Indf
SFX X58 0 тыр .	+Indf
SFX X58 0 сы .	+Clt/сы
